Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-356
Department, defined.

Department shall mean the Department of Health and Human Services.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 9;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 65;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 51;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 31.